Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202160-706
24/7 sobriety program permit; application; availability; revocation.

(1) Upon receipt by the director of (a) a certified copy of a court order issued under subsection (1) of section 60-705, (b) sufficient evidence that the individual has surrendered the individual's operator's license to the department, and (c) payment of the fee provided in section 60-4,115, such individual may apply for a 24/7 sobriety program permit. All permits issued pursuant to this section shall indicate that the permit is not valid for the operation of a commercial motor vehicle.

(2) A 24/7 sobriety program permit shall only be available to a holder of a Class M or O operator's license.

(3) The director shall revoke a 24/7 sobriety program permit issued under this section upon receipt of an (a) abstract of conviction indicating that the individual's operating privileges have been revoked or (b) order from a court revoking the individual's 24/7 sobriety program permit.

Laws 2021, LB271, § 6.
July 1, 2022